Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.450

Office of financial management central service account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The office of financial management central service account is created in the state treasury. The account is to be used by the office as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and other costs required for the operation and maintenance of statewide budgeting, accounting, forecasting, and functions and activities in the office. All receipts from agency fees and charges for services collected from public agencies must be deposited into the account. The director shall fix the terms and charges to agencies based on each agency's share of the office statewide cost allocation plan for federal funds. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, the account may be used as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and other costs related to policy activities in the office.

[ 2023 c 435 s 1; 2022 c 297 s 953; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 968; 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 927.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 435: See note following RCW 43.79.570.

Effective date—2022 c 297: See note following RCW 43.79.565.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.